Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 10
MERGER AND CONVERSION

7-80-1001 to 7-80-1007. (Repealed)

Editor's note:

(1) This part 10 was added in 1994. For amendments to this part 10 prior to its repeal in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) Section 7-80-1007 provided for the repeal of this part, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)